es: Tipo de estufa compatible: Estufa de alcohol; Estufa de bombona de butano; Estufa de isobutano-propano; Estufa multicombustible; Estufa de propano; Estufa de pastillas de combustible sólido; Universal; Estufa de leña; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de sobă compatibil: Sobă cu alcool; Sobă cu canistră de butan; Sobă cu izobutan-propan; Sobă multicombustibil; Sobă cu propan; Sobă cu tablete de combustibil solid; Universal; Sobă pe lemne; Altele
lt-LT: Suderinamas viryklės tipas: Alkoholio viryklė; Butano kanistrinė viryklė; Izobutano-propano viryklė; Daugiakurė viryklė; Propano viryklė; Kietojo kuro planšetinė viryklė; Universalus; Malkomis kūrenama krosnis; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ kachlí: Liehový varič; Butánový kartušový varič; Izobutánovo-propánový varič; Viacpalivový varič; Propánový varič; Varič na tablety tuhého paliva; Univerzálny; Varič na drevo; Iné
ko: 호환 스토브 유형: 알코올 스토브; 부탄 캔 스토브; 이소부탄-프로판 스토브; 다용도 연료 스토브; 프로판 스토브; 고체 연료 정제 스토브; 범용; 우드버닝 난로; 기타
el: Συμβατός τύπος κουζίνας: Σόμπα αλκοόλης; Σόμπα με φυσίγγιο βουτανίου; Σόμπα ισοβουτανίου-προπανίου; Σόμπα πολλαπλών καυσίμων; Σόμπα προπανίου; Σόμπα ταμπλέτας στερεού καυσίμου; Universal; Ξυλόσομπα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta štedilnika: Alkoholni kuhalnik; Peč na butan; Izobutan-propan štedilnik; Večgorivna peč; Propanski štedilnik; Tabletni štedilnik na trdo gorivo; Univerzalno; Peč na drva; Druga
pt-BR: Tipo de fogão compatível: Fogão a álcool; Fogão com cartucho de butano; Fogão a isobutano-propano; Fogareiro multicombustível; Fogão a gás propano; Fogão a pastilhas de combustível sólido; Universal; Fogão a lenha; Outro
zh-CN: 适用炉灶类型: 酒精炉; 丁烷气罐炉; 异丁烷-丙烷炉; 多燃料炉; 丙烷炉; 固体燃料片炉; 通用型; 柴火炉; 其他
nb: Kompatibel komfyrtype: Alkoholkomfyr; Butanbeholderovn; Isobutan-propan komfyr; Multibrenselovn; Propanovn; Tablettovn med fast brensel; Universal; Vedovn; Annet
cs: Typ kompatibilního sporáku: Lihový vařič; Butanový vařič; Isobutan-propanový vařič; Vícepalivový vařič; Propanový vařič; Vařič na tuhý líh; Univerzální; Vařič na dřevo; Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta štednjaka: Štednjak na alkohol; Štednjak sa spremnikom butana; Izobutan-propan štednjak; Štednjak na više goriva; Propanski štednjak; Štednjak na tabletu za kruto gorivo; Univerzalno; Peć na drva; Ostalo
ja: 対応ストーブのタイプ: アルコールストーブ; ブタンキャニスターストーブ; イソブタンプロパンストーブ; 多燃料ストーブ; プロパンストーブ; 固形燃料タブレットストーブ; ユニバーサル; 薪ストーブ; その他
de: Kompatibler Kochertyp: Spirituskocher; Butangas-Gaskocher; Isobutan-Propan-Kocher; Mehrstoffkocher; Propangaskocher; Trockenbrennstoffkocher; Universell; Holzkocher; Sonstiges
fr: Type de réchaud portable compatible: Réchaud à alcool; Réchaud à cartouche butane; Réchaud isobutane-propane; Réchaud multi-combustible; Réchaud à propane; Réchaud à comprimés à combustible solide; Universel; Réchaud à bois; Autre
nl: Compatibel type kachel: Alcoholbrander; Butaanbusbrander; Isobutaan-propaanbrander; Multifuel kachel; Propaanfornuis; Tabletbrander op vaste brandstof; Universeel; Houtkachel; Overig
zh-TW: 相容爐具類型: 酒精爐; 丁烷氣罐爐; 異丁烷-丙烷爐; 多燃料爐; 丙烷爐; 固態燃料錠爐; 通用; 燃木爐; 其他
tr: Uyumlu ocak tipi: Alkol ocağı; Bütan tüplü ocak; İzobütan-propan ocağı; Çok yakıtlı soba; Propan ocağı; Katı yakıt tabletli ocak; Evrensel; Odun sobası; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de fogão compatível: Fogão a álcool; Fogão com botija de butano; Fogão a isobutano-propano; Fogão multicombustível; Fogão a gás propano; Fogão a pastilhas de combustível sólido; Universal; Fogão a lenha; Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva liesityyppi: Alkoholikeitin; Butaanisäiliökeitin; Isobutaani-propaanikeitin; Monipolttoainekeitin; Propaaniliesi; Kiinteä polttoainetabletti -keitin; Yleinen; Puukäyttöinen keitin; Muu
pl: Zgodny typ kuchenki: Kuchenka spirytusowa; Kuchenka na kartridż butanowy; Kuchenka izobutan-propan; Kuchenka wielopaliwowa; Kuchenka propanowa; Kuchenka na tabletki paliwowe; Uniwersalne; Kuchenka na drewno; Pozostałe
ru: Совместимый тип плиты: Спиртовая горелка; Газовая горелка с баллоном на бутане; Горелка на изобутано-пропановой смеси; Многотопливная горелка; Пропановая горелка; Горелка на твердотопливных таблетках; Универсальный продукт; Дровяная печь; Другая
bg-BG: Съвместим тип печка: Алкохолен котлон; Туристически котлон за бутанова газ; Газов котлон с смес изобутан–пропан; Многогоривен котлон; Пропанов котлон; Котлон за твърди горивни таблетки; Универсално; Печка на дърва; Друго
sv: Kompatibel spistyp: Spritkök; Butanugnskamin; Isobutan-propan spis; Multibränslekamin; Propanspis; Tablettkök med fast bränsle; Universell; Vedeldad spis; Övrigt
en: Compatible stove type: Alcohol stove; Butane canister stove; Isobutane-propane stove; Multi-fuel stove; Propane stove; Solid fuel tablet stove; Universal; Wood-burning stove; Other
da: Kompatibel komfurtype: Alkoholkomfur; Komfur med butanbeholder; Komfur med isobutan-propan; Multibrændselskomfur; Propankomfur; Komfur med tablet med fast brændsel; Universal; Komfur med træbrændsel; Andet
vi: Loại bếp tương thích: Bếp cồn; Bếp dùng bình ga butan; Bếp dùng nhiên liệu isobutan-propan; Bếp đa nhiên liệu; Bếp ga propan; Bếp dùng viên nhiên liệu rắn; Phổ dụng; Bếp củi; Khác
th: ประเภทเตาที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เตาแอลกอฮอล์; เตาแก๊สกระป๋องบิวเทน; เตาแก๊สกระป๋องไอโซบิวเทน-โพรเพน; เตาอเนกประสงค์; เตาแก๊สกระป๋องโพรเพน; เตาเม็ดเชื้อเพลิงแข็ง; สากล; เตาฟืน; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di fornello compatibile: Fornello ad alcool; Fornello a bombola di butano; Stufa a isobutano-propano; Stufa multicombustibile; Stufa a propano; Stufa a combustibile solido; Universale; Stufa a legna; Altro
hu: Kompatibilis tűzhely típusa: Alkoholos tűzhely; Butántartályos tűzhely; Izobután-propán tűzhely; Többüzemanyagú tűzhely; Propán tűzhely; Szilárd tüzelőanyag-tablettával üzemelő tűzhely; Általános; Fatüzelésű kályha; Egyéb